Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.600

Motor vehicle transportation service—Transfer of passenger motor vehicles to department from other agencies—Studies—Agency exemptions.

(1) Any passenger motor vehicles currently owned or hereafter acquired by any state agency shall be purchased by or transferred to the department. The director may accept vehicles subject to the provisions of RCW 43.19.560 through 43.19.630, * 43.41.130 and * 43.41.140 prior to July 1, 1975, if he or she deems it expedient to accomplish an orderly transition.

(2) The department, in cooperation with the office of financial management, shall study and ascertain current and prospective needs of state agencies for passenger motor vehicles and shall direct the transfer to a state motor pool or other appropriate disposition of any vehicle found not to be required by a state agency.

(3) The department shall direct the transfer of passenger motor vehicles from a state agency to a state motor pool or other disposition as appropriate, based on a study under subsection (2) of this section, if a finding is made based on data therein submitted that the economy, efficiency, or effectiveness of state government would be improved by such a transfer or other disposition of passenger motor vehicles. Any dispute over the accuracy of data submitted as to the benefits in state governmental economy, efficiency, and effectiveness to be gained by such transfer shall be resolved by the director and the director of financial management. Unless otherwise determined by the director after consultation with the office of financial management, vehicles owned and managed by the department of transportation, the department of natural resources, and the Washington state patrol are exempt from the requirements of subsections (1) through (3) of this section.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 233; 2009 c 549 s 5068; 1982 c 163 s 12; 1979 c 151 s 102; 1975 1st ex.s. c 167 s 10.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.41.130 and 43.41.140 were recodified as RCW 43.19.622 and 43.19.623, respectively, pursuant to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 325.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Severability—Effective date—1982 c 163: See notes following RCW 2.10.052.

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 167: See note following RCW 43.19.560.